Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202672-813
Vacant buildings and excess land; list; compilation; review status; disposition; considerations.

(1) Each state agency shall by September 15 of each year submit to the State Building Administrator a list of all state-owned buildings and land for which it is responsible and shall note the uses of each building and parcel of land. The State Building Administrator shall compile the information on state-owned buildings and land and provide it, along with any other information or recommendations he or she may consider relevant to the purposes of sections 72-811 to 72-818, to the Director of Administrative Services and to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst. The information provided to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted electronically.

(2) The State Building Administrator shall review the information and consider further action or possible amendments to orders made pursuant to this section. If the administrator determines that there is reason to believe that any particular state-owned building or piece of land is vacant or excess, the director shall review the status of the building or land and determine whether it should be declared vacant or excess.

(3) If the director declares a building or land to be vacant or excess, the director shall order either maintenance of the building or land or the disposal of the building or land through sale, lease, demolition, or otherwise. Any order for disposal of a building may include related lands. In determining the appropriate action to be taken in regard to a building or land, the director shall consider the benefits to the state of the alternative possible actions, including cost-effectiveness, other possible future uses of the building or land for state purposes, and the necessity or utility of the building or land for the furtherance of existing or planned state programs.

Laws 1988, LB 1143, § 3;

Laws 1990, LB 830, § 3;

Laws 1992, LB 1241, § 8;

Laws 1995, LB 567, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 130;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 35.
July 1, 2026